Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-1,107
Complaint, indictment, or information; contents; sufficiency.

In any indictment, information, complaint, or affidavit against any one or more individuals charging the violation of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act, separate offenses under the act may be joined in the same indictment, information, complaint, or affidavit and the accused may be prosecuted and convicted upon all or any of such counts so joined the same as upon separate indictments, information, complaint, or affidavits and judgment may be rendered on each count upon which there is a conviction. In any indictment, information, complaint, or affidavit for any violation of the act, it shall not be necessary to describe the place where the offense was committed except to allege that it was committed in the county wherein the prosecution was had unless the particular place where the violation occurred constitutes one of specific ingredients of the offense and it shall not be necessary to negative any of the exceptions contained in the act or to state the day or the hour when the offense was committed unless the day or hour constitutes a special element or ingredient of the offense.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 73, p. 412;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-373;

R.S.1943, § 53-1,107;

Laws 1994, LB 859, § 14.